District of Columbia statutes.
21-1708

Conforming amendment.

When a fiduciary deposits in a bank to his personal credit checks:

(1)

drawn by him upon an account in his own name as fiduciary; or

(2)

payable to him as fiduciary; or

(3)

drawn by him upon an account in the name of his principal if he is empowered to draw checks thereon; or

(4)

payable to his principal and indorsed by him, if he is empowered to indorse such checks —

or if he otherwise deposits funds held by him as fiduciary, the bank has notice of the breach of fiduciary duty if the instrument is deposited to an account other than an account of the fiduciary, as such, or an account of the represented person.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 778, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
March 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-249, § 3, 42 DCR 467
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 20(d), 44 DCR 1271

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-1708.
1973 Ed., § 21-1708.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 9 of the Uniform Fiduciaries Act.